src/morphology/roots/pronouns.lexc
[WORD_ID=kukin][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kuksikin    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kulloisittakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kulloisiltakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kulloisillakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kulloisillekin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kulloisinekin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kulloisistakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kulloisinakin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kulloistenkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kulloisiinkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kulloisissakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:kulloisinkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kulloisetkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kulloisiakin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kulloisiksikin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kulloisettakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kulloiseltakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kulloisellakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kulloisellekin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kulloisestakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kulloisenakin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kulloisenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:kulloiseenkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kulloisessakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:kulloisenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kulloinenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kulloistakin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kulloiseksikin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kulloisitta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kulloisilta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kulloisilla   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kulloisille   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kulloisine    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kulloisista   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kulloisina    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kulloisten    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kulloisiin    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kulloisissa   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:kulloisin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kulloiset     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kulloisia     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kulloisiksi   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kulloisetta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kulloiselta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kulloisella   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kulloiselle   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kulloisesta   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kulloisena    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kulloisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:kulloiseen    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kulloisessa   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:kulloisen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kulloinen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kulloista     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kulloiseksi   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kulloinkin][POS=PROADVERB][SUBCAT=QUANTOR]:kulloinkin  ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kumpaisettakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kumpaiseltakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kumpaisellakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kumpaisellekin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kumpaisestakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kumpaisenakin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kumpaisenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:kumpaiseenkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kumpaisessakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:kumpaisenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kumpainenkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kumpaistakin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainenkin][POS=PROADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kumpaiseksikin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kumpaisitta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kumpaisittakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kumpaisilta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kumpaisiltakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kumpaisilla    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kumpaisillakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kumpaisille    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kumpaisillekin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kumpaisine     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kumpaisinekin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kumpaisista    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kumpaisistakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kumpaisina     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kumpaisinakin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kumpaisten     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kumpaistenkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kumpaisiin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kumpaisiinkin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kumpaisissa    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kumpaisissakin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:kumpaisin  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:kumpaisinkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kumpaiset  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:kumpaisetkin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kumpaisia  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:kumpaisiakin   A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kumpaisiksi    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:kumpaisiksikin     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:kumpaisetta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:kumpaiselta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:kumpaisella    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:kumpaiselle    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:kumpaisesta    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:kumpaisena     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:kumpaisen  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:kumpaiseen     A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:kumpaisessa    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:kumpaisen  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:kumpainen  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:kumpaista  A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpainen][POS=PROADJECTIVE][SUBCAT=INTERROGATIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:kumpaiseksi    A_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:kummittakaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:kummiltakaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:kummillakaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:kummillekaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=CMT]:kumpinekaan     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:kummistakaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:kumpinakaan     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:kumpienkaan     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:kumpiinkaan     PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
[WORD_ID=kumpikaan][POS=PRONOUN][SUBCAT=QUANTOR][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:kummissakaan    PRON_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
